Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 24 CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
17-24-113. Business operations and budget.

The division is hereby authorized, within appropriations which may be at its disposal, to procure or cause to be procured and maintained all necessary materials, supplies, space, services, and equipment required for the proper operation of the division.

The division shall require that the operation of industries be conducted on a thorough-going business basis, and the value of the labor and the amount of money received shall be accurately recorded, together with the number of work hours used in the production of correctional industries goods and services.

Except as provided in section 17-24-126, all revenues collected by the division from the sale of industry goods and services and from the sale or disposal of surplus state property shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to a special revolving enterprise account designated as the correctional industries account. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the correctional industries account shall be credited to said account. All moneys in said account shall be used for the purchase of requirements necessary for the production of industry goods and services, for the responsibilities set forth in section 17-24-106.6, and for all necessary personnel, in accordance with the annual appropriation by the general assembly; but such account shall not exceed the requirements of activities authorized by this article, as determined necessary by the director, and any excess, upon order of the director, shall be transferred to the general fund by the state treasurer.

Except as provided in section 17-24-126, all acquisitions, purchases, and loan repayments of the division shall be payable out of the revenues derived from the sale of correctional industry goods and services authorized in this article and from the sale or disposal of surplus state property under section 17-24-106.6.

The division is authorized to enter into a borrowing arrangement with the state treasurer or other organizations when initial money is needed for a new or expanded program, if the advisory committee has approved such an arrangement and such an arrangement is within the authorized appropriation for the division.

The director shall make regular reports, including monthly operating statements and annual financial reports, to the governor, the joint budget committee, and the office of state planning and budgeting regarding the financial operation of the division.

On January 1 of each year, the division shall submit a proposed annual budget as a part of the total budget of the department of corrections for the following fiscal year beginning July 1. The budget of the division shall be reviewed by the advisory committee. This proposed budget shall contain at least the following:

Repealed.

A statement of proposed industry products and services to be produced by the division during said fiscal year and their prices;

A statement of the past, current, and expected number of offenders employed in each program and at each institution;

A financial statement of past, current, and expected production levels, sales revenues, operating expenses, profits, and reversions to the general fund of the division;

A statement of the payment rates specified in section 17-24-110;

A statement of past, current, and expected staff personnel;

Capital requirements for equipment and facilities;

All budgetary schedules, forms, and other information required by the joint budget committee.

The general assembly, upon recommendation of the joint budget committee, shall make appropriations based on the evaluation of the budget request that determines the production level and financial operation of the division.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 932, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 86:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 754, § 3, effective July 1, 1987.

L. 93:

(7)(a) repealed, p. 29, § 1, effective March 18.

L. 97:

(3) amended, p. 78, § 2, effective March 24.

L. 98:

(3) amended, p. 368, § 2, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 220, § 3, effective April 3; (3) and (4) amended, p. 56, § 2, effective July 1.

17-24-114. Provisions for inmates - rules.

The director, in collaboration with the department, shall determine inmate work assignments within the division. Each inmate work assignment must take into account the diagnostic services unit recommendation of employment training needs of the inmate, the security classification of the inmate as determined by the superintendent of each correctional institution, and the rehabilitation, reentry, and reintegration needs of the inmate.

The director shall establish the compensation rate for the inmates working in internal programs. Payment rates must be established on an annual basis after review by the joint budget committee and by appropriation of the general assembly. The director shall not compensate an inmate if the inmate refuses to participate in an available rehabilitation and work program.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

The division has the power to establish rules governing the employment, conduct, and management of inmates while assigned to internal programs. All such rules pertaining to the payment, employment, conduct, and management of inmates must be published and posted for inmates.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 934, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 78:

(2) amended, p. 360, § 2, effective May 2.

L. 80:

(2) amended, p. 526, § 6, effective March 25.

L. 90:

(3) amended, p. 954, § 23, effective May 25.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 1149, § 8, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 857, § 67, effective May 24.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-050), ch. 51, p. 243, § 9, effective March 30.

17-24-115. Rules and regulations.

Pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., the director has the power to promulgate the rules and regulations which are deemed necessary for the implementation of this article.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 934, § 10, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-25-110 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-24-116. Sole authority.

The division shall have sole authority for operating any programs within the adult correctional institutions of this state.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 934, § 10, effective August 1.

17-24-117. Penalty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 934, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 93:

Entire section repealed, p. 2129, § 2, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 27-25-112 as it existed prior to 1977.

17-24-118. Treasurer and controller to write off debt. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 711, § 1, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1980. (See L. 79, p. 711.)

17-24-119. Training and employment by organizations - account for proceeds and wages.

The division, after consultation with the respective superintendents of the correctional facilities and with the director of the division of adult parole, is authorized to contract with any corporation, association, labor organization, or private nonprofit organization or with any federal or state agency for the purpose of training or employing offenders who have been committed to the department of corrections or who have been assigned to a community correctional program.

Proceeds and wages due an offender from the sale of products produced by the offender under a program authorized by subsection (1) of this section shall be held in an account maintained by the division and distributed periodically for:

Compensation of the victim of the crime committed by the offender in an amount not to exceed forty percent of the offender's wages for expenses actually and reasonably incurred as a result of the injury to the person or property of the victim, including medical expenses, loss of earning power, and any other pecuniary loss directly resulting from the injury to the person or property or the death of the victim, which a court of competent jurisdiction determines to be reasonable and proper;

Payment of such amounts for the support of the offender's dependents as is deemed appropriate by the division after consultation with the respective superintendents of the correctional facilities and with the director of the division of adult parole;

Establishment of funds in trust for the offender upon his release; except that an amount consistent with the payment plan for existing correctional industries programs shall be allocated by the division to the offender for personal expenses while serving his sentence;

Voluntary payment of such amounts to the victims assistance and law enforcement fund established in section 24-33.5-506, C.R.S., as is deemed appropriate by the division after consultation with the respective superintendents of the correctional facilities and with the director of the division of adult parole.

A portion of said wages and proceeds in an amount determined by the division, but not to exceed twenty percent, may be used to defray the costs incident to the offender's confinement.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to a program established pursuant to this section and not to other programs established pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 963, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 1430, § 8, effective June 11.

L. 96:

(2)(d) added, p. 1149, § 9, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(1), (2)(b), and (2)(d) amended, p. 857, § 68, effective May 24.

17-24-120. Treasurer and controller to write off amount owed state. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 82:

Entire section added, p. 310, § 1, effective March 25.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1983. (See L. 82, p. 310.)

17-24-121. Venture agreements.

The department of corrections, working through the division, is authorized to enter into agreements with private persons for the utilization of inmate labor in the manufacture, processing, or assembly of components, finished goods, services, or product lines within facilities owned or leased by the department. Such agreements shall be subject to the prior review of the attorney general and the correctional industries advisory committee.

The department is authorized to enter into agreements subject to state fiscal rules and the prior review of the attorney general which allow for shared financing by the division and the private contractor for the facility, equipment, raw materials, and operation of industries developed pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Inmates producing goods and services under the terms of an agreement authorized by this section shall be paid on a scale to be determined by the executive director of the department in the best interests of the division.

The division is authorized to market goods and services produced under a venture agreement to any office, department, institution, or agency supported in whole or in part by the state or any political subdivision thereof or to any other state, the federal government, any nonprofit organization, any private sector retailer, or the general public.

The wages of an inmate working under an agreement entered into pursuant to this section with a private person shall be distributed under guidelines established by the executive director in order to offset the cost of imprisonment and incidental expenses, pay court-ordered restitution, make voluntary payments to the victims assistance and law enforcement fund established in section 24-33.5-506, C.R.S., pay the pro rata share of child support cost as established by the department of human services, and establish a savings account to assist the inmate upon release and to offset state costs at the time of release.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 664, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(5) amended, p. 1813, § 6, effective June 1.

L. 95:

Entire section RC&RE, p. 875, § 9, effective May 24.

L. 96:

(5) amended, p. 1149, § 10, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

Prior to this section being recreated and reenacted in 1995, former subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective June 30, 1994. (See L. 87, p. 664.)

17-24-122. Agreements for the employment of inmates by private entities.

The division, in collaboration with the department, is authorized to enter into agreements with private persons or entities to provide employment opportunities for inmates through external programs. Such agreements are subject to the prior review of the attorney general and the correctional industries advisory committee.

The division, in collaboration with the department, is authorized to enter into agreements subject to state fiscal rules and the prior review of the attorney general that allow for private party financing for equipment, raw materials, training of workers, and operation of industries developed pursuant to the provisions of this section. In any such agreement, the department may provide for the recovery of the costs of providing facilities for the private contractor by requiring the payment of rent for such facilities.

Agreements entered into pursuant to this section must provide that any inmate assigned pursuant to section 17-24-114 (1) to an external program for a private person or entity that made such agreement pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is an employee of the private person or entity and, notwithstanding section 17-24-114 (2), the private person or entity shall pay at least the state minimum wage for the labor performed. Such wages must be paid to the department and shall be held in an account for the inmate. Section 8-40-301 (3) applies to any inmate employed by a private person or entity pursuant to this section.

Repealed.

Out of the inmate's wages, the department shall deduct periodically for the following purposes and in the following order of priority:

Restitution for the victim of the crime committed by the inmate for expenses actually and reasonably incurred as a result of the injury to the person or property of the victim, including medical expenses, loss of earning power, and any other pecuniary loss directly resulting from the injury to the person or property or the death of the victim, which a court of competent jurisdiction determines or has determined to be reasonable and proper;

Voluntary payment of such amounts to the victims assistance and law enforcement fund established in section 24-33.5-506, as is deemed appropriate by the executive director of the department;

Payment of such amounts for the support of the inmate's dependents as is deemed appropriate by the executive director of the department, taking into account any court orders for such support; and

Payment of personal expenses of the inmate as deemed appropriate by the executive director.

Any amounts of money that remain in the inmate's account after the deductions made pursuant to this section must be paid to the inmate upon parole or discharge from custody. If an inmate dies prior to discharge from custody and the body goes unclaimed for more than five days, the amount remaining in the inmate's account may be used to defray any costs incurred by the state of Colorado in connection with the burial of the inmate, and any amount remaining after burial costs have been paid or the body has been claimed must be paid to the inmate's estate.

Any agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall provide that appropriate security measures for a state correctional facility shall not be jeopardized due to any operations which result from such agreement.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 2127, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 1097, § 17, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(5)(a.5) added, p. 1150, § 11, effective June 1.

L. 2022:

(1), (2), (3), (5), and (6) amended and (4) and (8) repealed, (SB 22-050), ch. 51, p. 244, § 10, effective March 30.

17-24-123. Clean-up of illegally disposed and abandoned waste tires - services to counties.

The general assembly finds that the clean-up, removal, and transportation of illegally dumped, stored, or abandoned waste tires is necessary and that inmate labor is one source of labor that should be used to correct these problems.

The division is authorized to:

Provide labor using supervised inmate crews to counties or private entities for the clean-up, loading, and any on-site processing of illegally dumped, stored, or abandoned waste tires prior to transporting such waste tires to a county- or state-approved recycling or disposal facility and to pay the personnel and operating costs necessary to do so;

Contract with county and city and county sheriffs for the provision of supervised inmate crews to clean up illegally dumped, stored, or abandoned waste tires;

Contract with private haulers for the moving of illegally dumped, stored, or abandoned waste tires to a county- or state-approved recycling or disposal facility and shall do so whenever feasible and cost-effective; and

Pay any fees necessary for a county- or state-approved recycling or disposal facility to accept illegally dumped, stored, or abandoned waste tires.

Any moneys received from contracts entered into pursuant to this section shall be credited to the correctional industries account described in section 17-24-113 (3).

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 813, § 1, effective May 23.

17-24-124. Inmate disaster relief program - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that inmates housed in certain prison facilities throughout the state form a labor pool that could be safely utilized to fight forest fires, help with flood relief, and assist in the prevention of or clean up after other natural or man-made disasters.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "disaster" means the occurrence or imminent threat of widespread or severe damage, injury, or loss of life or property resulting from any natural cause or cause of human origin, but "disaster" does not include any hazardous substance incident, oil spill or other contamination, epidemic, air pollution, blight, drought, infestation, explosion, civil disturbance, or hostile military or paramilitary action.

There is hereby established in the division the inmate disaster relief program, referred to in this section as the "program". The purpose of the program shall be to establish one or more inmate disaster relief crews composed of inmates from minimum restrictive, or minimum security facilities. An inmate shall receive an additional amount of earned time pursuant to section 17-22.5-405 in the amount of one day of earned time for every day spent at the site of a disaster. An inmate disaster relief crew may be utilized by the state or by local or federal governmental agencies that apply to the division for assistance.

The executive director shall promulgate rules governing the program including but not limited to:

The inmates who are eligible to participate in the program;

Types of disasters to which an inmate disaster relief crew may be sent;

The security measures that are required to prevent escapes and protect the public;

The procedures that must be followed before an inmate disaster relief crew may be utilized;

The fees that may be charged by the division for the provision of services by an inmate disaster relief crew; and

The compensation that may be paid to inmates participating in the program.

The division is authorized to purchase equipment and obtain necessary training for any inmate disaster relief crews.

The department is authorized to solicit, accept, and expend grants, donations, gifts, and other moneys to defer the costs of equipping and training one or more inmate disaster relief crews. The program shall not be implemented or made available to other agencies until sufficient moneys are available from appropriations, grants, donations, gifts, and other moneys to cover the costs of equipping and training at least one inmate disaster relief crew.

The department shall distribute the informational materials described in section 24-33.5-1226.5 to persons who have experience in wildland fire services pursuant to the program.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 17, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2001:

(3) and (6) amended, p. 1452, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2021:

(7) added, (HB 21-012), ch. 29, p. 123, § 4, effective April 15.

17-24-125. Correctional industries at nonstate-owned facilities - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Inmate labor program" means a program operated at a nonstate-owned prison facility as a business or for profit utilizing in whole or in part labor of inmates; except that "inmate labor program" does not include a program that is operated by a local government or combination of local governments of this state as a nonprofit business within the jurisdiction boundaries of the local government or governments and whose operation has been reviewed and approved by the local government or local governments.

"Nonstate-owned prison facility" means any private correctional facility or any jail or other detention facility operated by a political subdivision of the state that houses state prisoners or that houses inmates from another state whose incarceration in this state is approved pursuant to section 17-1-104.5; except that "nonstate-owned prison facility" shall not include a jail or other detention facility operated by a political subdivision of the state that only houses state prisoners pursuant to a contract under section 16-11-308.5 (2), C.R.S., or a facility in which a community corrections program is operated pursuant to article 27 of this title.

On and after March 1, 1999, all inmate labor programs operated at a nonstate-owned prison facility shall be approved by the division prior to commencing operations.

Repealed.

On or before February 1, 1999, the division shall promulgate rules governing the approval required by subsection (2) of this section including but not limited to:

Establishing a procedure for approving inmate labor programs that shall include review by the correctional industries advisory committee of a business plan for each inmate labor program;

Establishing the duration of any approval and procedures for reapproval and revocation of any approval;

Requiring all inmate labor programs to comply with all federal laws and regulations relating to the use of inmate labor;

Requiring that all goods or services be priced at prevailing market rates; except that goods or services sold to governmental or nonprofit entities may be priced at wholesale cost;

Requiring that persons employed by a nonstate-owned prison facility shall not be involved in decisions involving the inmate labor program relating to persons or entities with whom the person has a conflict or potential conflict of interest;

Requiring that inmates be compensated as determined by rule promulgated by the department;

Requiring that all records pertaining to inmate labor programs shall be available for inspection and copying by representatives of the division to ensure compliance with this section and any rules promulgated thereunder; and

Requiring nonstate-owned prison facilities to reimburse the division for any expenses incurred in certifying and monitoring the inmate labor programs.

The rules promulgated pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be substantially similar to the rules governing programs at facilities operated by the department.

Each nonstate-owned prison facility operating an inmate labor program shall hold wages earned by an inmate in a revenue-producing account for the inmate until the inmate is paroled or discharged from custody. Out of the wages held for an inmate pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (4)(a), the nonstate-owned prison facility shall make disbursements pursuant to the provisions of section 17-24-122 (5) and (6).

Each nonstate-owned prison facility operating an inmate labor program shall hold and distribute wages earned by an inmate from a state other than Colorado pursuant to the statutes and rules of that state or the contract between that state and the prison facility.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 424, § 1, effective April 21.

L. 2022:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 22-050), ch. 51, p. 246, § 11, effective March 30.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2)(b)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (2)(b), effective January 1, 2000. (See L. 98, p. 424.)

17-24-126. Canteen, vending machine, and library account created - receipts - disbursements.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special revolving enterprise account to be known as the canteen, vending machine, and library account. The account shall be used by the division to establish and operate a canteen for the use and benefit of the inmates of state correctional facilities and to operate vending machines for the use of visitors to state correctional facilities. The moneys in the account shall be continuously available to the division and are appropriated for the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section.

The canteen and vending machines shall be managed by the division, and they shall not be operated in any manner for the personal profit of any employees of the division or any inmates of state correctional facilities.

Items in the canteen shall be sold to inmates, and items in vending machines shall be sold to visitors, at prices set so that revenues from the sale are sufficient to fund all expenses of the canteen and vending machines, including the cost of services of employees of the canteen and the cost of servicing the vending machines, and to produce a reasonable profit. All revenues derived from the canteen and vending machines and interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the canteen, vending machine, and library account shall be credited to such account. Any profits arising from the operation of the canteen and vending machines shall be expended for the educational, recreational, and social benefit of the inmates and to supplement direct inmate needs.

Part 2 of article 84 of title 8, C.R.S., regarding vending facilities in state buildings, does not apply to vending machines operated in visiting areas of any department facility.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 57, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(5) repealed, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 951, § 39, effective August 5; (4) amended, (SB 15-239), ch. 160, p. 488, § 9, effective July 1, 2016.